Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5945.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 36-4 of the General Laws entitled "Merit System" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
36-4-15.1. Specialized information technology positions in state service.
(a) For purposes of this section: “specialized information technology position” means a
technical or specialized job classification in state service under the supervision and/or purview of
the division of enterprise technology strategy and services (“ETSS”), within the department of
administration. Such positions may include, but are not limited to, information technology
leadership roles (i.e., chief information officer, chief technology officer, chief information security
officer, etc.) software/application/cloud architects, engineers, developers and/or programmers,
cybersecurity professionals, artificial intelligence analysts, data/database/cloud administrators, and
any other information technology positions of a specialized and/or technical nature.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law or regulation to the
contrary, including the personnel rules adopted pursuant to § 36-4-8, the personnel administrator,
in their sole discretion, may modify, change or amend any official pay plan for employees in the
classified or unclassified service in order to create new job classifications, and/or modify the title,
content or pay grade of an existing job classification, for any new or existing specialized
information technology positions.
(c) The personnel administrator is hereby authorized to take whatever administrative action
is necessary to implement the changes to the official pay plans made pursuant to this section with

respect to new or existing specialized information technology positions without conducting a public
hearing or obtaining the approval of the governor prior to the implementation of any such action.
(d) Within thirty (30) days after any personnel action under this section, the personnel
administrator shall file a written report with the governor, the speaker of the house, the senate
president, and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees. This report shall
include:
(1) The title and paygrade of the position(s);
(2) The job description of the position; and
(3) The reason why the position is necessary. The personnel administrator shall also post
the report on the division of human resources’ website for at least one year.
(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any specialized information technology
position utilized by ETSS that is part of a collective bargaining unit established and certified by the
Rhode Island state labor relations board.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001970
========
LC001970 - Page 2 of 3